Illinois, session 104th, SB1363.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-10.10 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 430/5-10.10 new)7    Sec. 5-10.10. Cybersecurity training.8    (a) Each officer, member, and employee must complete, at 9least annually, a cybersecurity training program. A person who 10fills a vacancy in an elective or appointed position that 11requires training under this Section must complete the initial 12cybersecurity training program within 30 days after 13commencement of office or employment. The training shall 14include, at a minimum, information concerning: (i) the types 15of cybersecurity threats, including malware, phishing, social 16engineering, and ransomware; (ii) the creation of strong 17passwords and the proper use of passwords and multi-factor 18authentication; (iii) the applicability of data privacy 19regulations and best practices for proper data handling, and 20secure file sharing; (iv) the recognition and avoidance of 21suspicious links, attachments, and unsafe websites; and (v) 22the actions that should be taken to secure personal and 23government devices and report lost or stolen devices. Proof of   SB1363- 2 -LRB104 06502 BDA 16538 b1completion of the training required under this Section must be 2submitted to the applicable ethics officer. Cybersecurity 3training programs shall be overseen by the appropriate Ethics 4Commission and Inspector General appointed under this Act.5    (b) Each ultimate jurisdictional authority shall submit to 6the applicable Ethics Commission, at least annually, or more 7frequently as required by that Commission, a report that 8summarizes the cybersecurity training program that was 9completed during the previous year, and lays out the plan for 10the training program in the coming year. The report shall 11include the names of individuals that failed to complete the 12required training program. An Ethics Commission shall not make 13the reports available on its website.